Florida, session 2026, SB834.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 624.1265, 13 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 14 624.1265âNonprofit religious organization exemption; 15 authority; notice.â 16 (1)âA nonprofit religious organization is not subject to 17 the requirements of the Florida Insurance Code if the nonprofit 18 religious organization: 19 (a)âQualifies under Title 26, s. 501 of the Internal 20 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; 21 (b)âLimits its participants to those members who share a 22 common set of ethical or religious beliefs; 23 (c)âActs as a facilitator among participants who have 24 financial, physical, or medical needs to assist those with 25 financial, physical, or medical needs in accordance with 26 criteria established by the nonprofit religious organization; 27 (d)âProvides for the financial or medical needs of a 28 participant through contributions from other participants, or 29 through payments directly from one participant to another 30 participant; 31 (e)âProvides amounts that participants may contribute, with 32 no assumption of risk and no promise to pay: 33 1.âAmong the participants; or 34 2.âBy the nonprofit religious organization to the 35 participants; 36 (f)âProvides a monthly accounting to the participants of 37 the total dollar amount of qualified needs actually shared in 38 the previous month in accordance with criteria established by 39 the nonprofit religious organization; and 40 (g)âConducts an annual audit that is performed by an 41 independent certified public accounting firm in accordance with 42 generally accepted accounting principles and that is made 43 available to the public by providing a copy upon request or by 44 posting on the nonprofit religious organizationâs website; and 45 (h)âDoes not market or sell health plans through agents 46 licensed by the department under chapter 626. 47 (3)âThe nonprofit religious organization, or any agent 48 licensed by the department under chapter 626 which markets or 49 facilitates a health care sharing arrangement on behalf of the 50 nonprofit religious organization, shall provide a written 51 disclaimer on or accompanying all applications and guideline 52 materials distributed by or on behalf of the nonprofit religious 53 organization. The disclaimer must read in substance: âNotice: 54 The organization facilitating the sharing of medical expenses is 55 not an insurance company, and neither its guidelines nor its 56 plan of operation is an insurance policy. Membership is not 57 offered through an insurance company, and the organization is 58 not subject to the regulatory requirements or consumer 59 protections of the Florida Insurance Code. Whether anyone 60 chooses to assist you with your medical bills will be totally 61 voluntary because no other participant is compelled by law to 62 contribute toward your medical bills. As such, participation in 63 the organization or a subscription to any of its documents 64 should never be considered to be insurance. Regardless of 65 whether you receive any payments for medical expenses or whether 66 this organization continues to operate, you are always 67 personally responsible for the payment of your own medical 68 bills.â 69 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.